North Carolina statutes. Chapter 128. Offices and Public Officers.
Article 3. Retirement System for Counties, Cities and Towns.
§ 128-27.
Benefits.

Service Retirement Benefits. —

Any member may retire upon electronic submission or written application to the Board of Trustees setting forth at what time, as of the first day of a calendar month, not less than one day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, he desires to be retired: Provided, that the said member at the time so specified for his retirement shall have attained the age of 60 years and have at least five years of creditable service or shall have completed 30 years of creditable service, or if a firefighter or rescue squad worker, he shall have attained the age of 55 years and have at least five years of creditable service.

Repealed by Session Laws 1983 (Regular Session, 1984), c. 1019, s. 1.

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 325, s. 12.

Any member who was in service October 8, 1981, who had attained 60 years of age, may retire upon electronic submission or written application to the Board of Trustees setting forth at what time, as of the first day of a calendar month, not less than one day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, he desires to be retired.

Any member who is a law enforcement officer and who (i) attains age 50 and completes 15 or more years of creditable service in this capacity, or (ii) attains age 55 and completes five or more years of creditable service in this capacity, or (iii) who has completed 25 years of creditable service with a minimum of 15 years of creditable service in a law enforcement capacity may retire upon electronic submission or written application to the Board of Trustees setting forth at what time, as of the first day of a calendar month, not less than one day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, the member desires to be retired; provided, also, any member who has met the conditions required by this subdivision but does not retire, and later becomes an employee other than as a law enforcement officer, continues to have the right to commence retirement.

(a1)

Early Service Retirement Benefits. —

Any member may retire and receive a reduced retirement allowance upon electronic submission or written application to the Board of Trustees setting forth at what time, as of the first day of a calendar month, not less than one day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, he desires to be retired: Provided, that the said member at the time so specified for his retirement shall have attained the age of 50 years and have at least 20 years of creditable service.

(a2)

Discontinued Service Retirement Allowance. —

A member whose employment with a participating employer is involuntarily terminated as a result of a termination event as defined in this subsection may be allowed a discontinued service retirement allowance, provided that the discontinued service retirement allowance is approved by the terminated member’s participating employer, and provided that reemployment with that participating employer is not available to the member at the time of the termination event. For purposes of this section, “termination event” means termination of employment as a result of (i) the participating employer’s cessation of operations; (ii) the participating employer’s dissolution; (iii) the merger of a participating employer with and into an unrelated entity, other than another participating employer; (iv) the acquisition of the participating employer by an unrelated entity, other than another participating employer; or (v) the determination by the participating employer that a reduction in force will accomplish economies in the participating employer’s budget resulting from either the elimination of a job and its responsibilities or from lack of funds to support the job. Final action approving the discontinued service retirement allowance for a terminated member by the member’s participating employer shall be taken in an open meeting.Upon the occurrence of a termination event, and subject to the provisions of this subsection, an unreduced discontinued service retirement allowance, not otherwise allowed under this Chapter, may be approved for terminated members with 20 or more years of creditable service who are at least 55 years of age. Alternatively, upon the occurrence of a termination event, a discontinued service retirement allowance, not otherwise allowed under this Chapter, may be approved for terminated members with 20 or more years of creditable service who are at least 50 years of age, reduced by one-fourth of one percent (1/4 of 1%) for each month that retirement precedes the member’s fifty-fifth birthday.In cases in which a discontinued service retirement allowance is approved, the terminated member’s employer shall be responsible for making a lump-sum payment to the Retirement System’s Board of Trustees equal to the actuarial present value of the additional liabilities imposed upon the Retirement System, to be determined by the Retirement System’s consulting actuary, as a result of the discontinued service retirement allowance, plus an administrative fee to be determined by the Board of Trustees. An employer shall not discriminate against any member or group of members employed by the employer in the approval or disapproval of a discontinued service retirement allowance.

(a3)

(Effective until July 1, 2022) Anti-Pension-Spiking Contribution-Based Benefit Cap. —

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, every service retirement allowance provided under this section for members who retire on or after January 1, 2015, is subject to adjustment pursuant to a contribution-based benefit cap under this subsection. The Board of Trustees shall adopt a contribution-based benefit cap factor recommended by the actuary, based upon actual experience, such that no more than three-quarters of one percent (0.75%) of retirement allowances are expected to be capped. The Board of Trustees shall modify such factors every five years, as shall be deemed necessary, based upon the five-year experience study as required by G.S. 128-28(o).Prior to establishing a service retirement allowance under this section, the Board shall:

(1)

Determine an amount equal to the member’s accumulated contributions as required under G.S. 128-30(b)(1) for all years during which the member earned membership service, other than service earned through armed service credit under

G.S. 128-26(a1)

or G.S. 128-26(j1), used in the calculation of the retirement allowance that the member would receive under this section.

(2)

Determine the amount of a single life annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the amount determined under subdivision (1) of this subsection, adjusted for the age of the member at the time of retirement or, when appropriate, the age at the time of the member’s death.

(3)

Multiply the annuity amount determined under subdivision (2) of this subsection by the contribution-based benefit cap factor.

(4)

Determine the amount of the retirement allowance that results from the member’s membership service.The product of the multiplication in subdivision (3) of this subsection is the member’s contribution-based benefit cap. If the amount determined under subdivision (4) of this subsection exceeds the member’s contribution-based benefit cap, the member’s retirement allowance shall be reduced by an amount equal to the difference between the contribution-based benefit cap and the amount determined under subdivision (4) of this subsection.Notwithstanding the foregoing, the retirement allowance of a member with an average final compensation of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), as hereinafter indexed, shall not be subject to the contribution-based benefit cap. The minimum average final compensation necessary for a retirement allowance to be subject to the contribution-based benefit cap shall be increased on January 1 each year by the percent change between the June Consumer Price Index in the year prior to retirement and the June Consumer Price Index in the fiscal year most recently ended, calculated to the nearest tenth of a percent (0.1%), provided that this percent change is positive.Notwithstanding the foregoing, the retirement allowance of a member who became a member before January 1, 2015, or who has not earned at least five years of membership service in the Retirement System after January 1, 2015, shall not be reduced; however, the member’s last employer shall be required to make an additional contribution as specified in G.S. 128-30(g)(2)b., if applicable.

(a3)

(Effective July 1, 2022) Anti-Pension-Spiking Contribution-Based Benefit Cap. —

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, every service retirement allowance provided under this section for members who retire on or after January 1, 2015, is subject to adjustment pursuant to a contribution-based benefit cap under this subsection. The Board of Trustees shall adopt a contribution-based benefit cap factor recommended by the actuary, based upon actual experience, such that no more than three-quarters of one percent (0.75%) of retirement allowances are expected to be capped. The Board of Trustees shall modify such factors every five years, as shall be deemed necessary, based upon the five-year experience study as required by G.S. 128-28(o).Prior to establishing a service retirement allowance under this section, the Board shall:

(1)

Determine an amount equal to the member’s accumulated contributions as required under G.S. 128-30(b)(1) for all years during which the member earned membership service, other than service earned through armed service credit under

G.S. 128-26(a1)

or G.S. 128-26(j1), used in the calculation of the retirement allowance that the member would receive under this section.

(2)

Determine the amount of a single life annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the amount determined under subdivision (1) of this subsection, adjusted for the age of the member at the time of retirement or, when appropriate, the age at the time of the member’s death.

(3)

Multiply the annuity amount determined under subdivision (2) of this subsection by the contribution-based benefit cap factor.

(4)

Determine the amount of the retirement allowance that results from the member’s membership service, to which the member would be entitled but for the adjustment under this subsection. This amount shall be calculated in the same manner as the member’s service retirement allowance, with the following exceptions: The applicable percentage of the member’s average final compensation shall be multiplied by the number of years of membership service, rather than the number of years of creditable service; the amount shall include the effect of any percentage reduction that applies to the member’s service retirement allowance by virtue of the member’s age or amount of creditable service as of the service retirement date; and the amount shall not be adjusted for an optional allowance elected under subsection (g) of this section.The product of the multiplication in subdivision (3) of this subsection is the member’s contribution-based benefit cap. If the amount determined under subdivision (4) of this subsection exceeds the member’s contribution-based benefit cap, the member’s retirement allowance shall be reduced by an amount equal to the difference between the contribution-based benefit cap and the amount determined under subdivision (4) of this subsection.Notwithstanding the foregoing, the retirement allowance of a member with an average final compensation of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), as hereinafter indexed, shall not be subject to the contribution-based benefit cap. The minimum average final compensation necessary for a retirement allowance to be subject to the contribution-based benefit cap shall be increased on January 1 each year by the percent change between the June Consumer Price Index in the year prior to retirement and the June Consumer Price Index in the fiscal year most recently ended, calculated to the nearest tenth of a percent (0.1%), provided that this percent change is positive.Notwithstanding the foregoing, the retirement allowance of a member who became a member before January 1, 2015, or who has not earned at least five years of membership service in the Retirement System after January 1, 2015, shall not be reduced; however, the member’s last employer, or if the member’s last employer did not report to the retirement system any compensation paid to the member during the period used to compute the member’s average final compensation, the member’s employer or employers who reported compensation to the member during such period, shall be required to make an additional contribution as specified in G.S. 128-30(g)(2)b., if applicable.

Service Retirement Allowance of Persons Retiring on or after July 1, 1959, but prior to July 1, 1965. — Upon retirement from service on or after July 1, 1959, but prior to July 1, 1965, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance which shall consist of:

An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his accumulated contributions at the time of his retirement; and

A pension equal to the annuity allowable at the age of 65 years or at his retirement age, whichever is the earlier, on the basis of contributions made prior to such earlier age; and

If he has a prior service certificate in full force and effect, an additional pension which shall be equal to the annuity which would have been provided at the age of 65 years, or at the earlier age of retirement if prior thereto, by twice the contributions which he would have made during such period of service had the System been in operation and he contributed thereunder at the rate of

Six and twenty-five hundredths percent (6.25%) of his compensation if such certificate is a Class A certificate, or

Five percent (5%) of his compensation if such certificate is a Class B certificate, or

Four percent (4%) of his compensation if such certificate is a Class C certificate.

(b1)

Service Retirement Allowances of Persons Retiring on or after July 1, 1965, but prior to July 1, 1967. —

Upon retirement from service on or after July 1, 1965, but prior to July 1, 1967, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance which shall consist of:

(1)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday, such allowance shall be equal to the sum of (i) one percent (1%) of the portion of his average final compensation not in excess of forty-eight hundred dollars ($4,800), plus one and one-half percent (11/2%) of the portion of such compensation in excess of forty-eight hundred dollars ($4,800) multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service rendered prior to January 1, 1966, and (ii) one percent (1%) of the portion of his average final compensation not in excess of forty-eight hundred dollars ($4,800), plus one and one-half percent (11/2%) of the portion of such compensation in excess of fifty-six hundred dollars ($5,600), multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service rendered after January 1, 1966.

(2a)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixtieth birthday but before his sixty-fifth birthday, his service retirement allowance shall be computed as in (1) above but shall be reduced by five twelfths of one percent (5/12 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his sixty-fifth birthday.

(2b)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixtieth birthday, his service retirement allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years as computed in (2a) above.

(3)

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1965, and uniformed policemen or firemen not covered under the Social Security Act employed thereafter, shall receive not less than the benefit provided by G.S. 128-27(b).

(b2)

Service Retirement Allowances of Persons Retiring on or after July 1, 1967, but prior to July 1, 1969. —

Upon retirement from service on or after July 1, 1967, but prior to July 1, 1969, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance which shall consist of:

(1)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday, such allowance shall be equal to one and one-quarter percent (11/4%) of the portion of his average final compensation not in excess of five thousand six hundred dollars ($5,600) plus one and one-half percent (11/2%) of the portion of such compensation in excess of five thousand six hundred dollars ($5,600), multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2a)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixty-fifth birthday, his service retirement allowance shall be computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his sixty-fifth birthday.

(2b)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixtieth birthday, his service retirement allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years as computed in (2a) above.

(3)

Notwithstanding the foregoing provision, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1965, and policemen or firemen not covered under the Social Security Act employed thereafter, shall receive not less than the benefits provided by G.S. 128-27(b).

(b3)

Service Retirement Allowances of Persons Retiring on or after July 1, 1969, but prior to July 1, 1973. —

Upon retirement from service on or after July 1, 1969, but prior to July 1, 1973, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance which shall consist of:

(1)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday, regardless of his years of creditable service, or on or after his sixty-second birthday and the completion of 30 years of creditable service, such allowance shall be equal to one and one-quarter percent (11/4%) of the portion of his average final compensation not in excess of fifty-six hundred dollars ($5,600) plus one and one-half percent (11/2%) of the portion of such compensation in excess of fifty-six hundred dollars ($5,600), multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2a)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixty-fifth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his service retirement allowance shall be computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his sixty-fifth birthday.

(2b)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixtieth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his service retirement allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years as computed in (2a) above.

(3a)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixty-second birthday but on or after his sixtieth birthday and on or after completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his service retirement allowance shall be computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his sixty-second birthday.

(3b)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixtieth birthday but on or after completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his service retirement allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years as computed in (3a) above.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1965, and uniformed policemen or firemen not covered under the Social Security Act employed thereafter, shall receive not less than the benefits provided by G.S. 128-27(b).

(b4)

Service Retirement Allowances of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1973, but prior to July 1, 1976. —

Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1973, but prior to July 1, 1976, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

(1)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday, regardless of his years of creditable service, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, such allowance shall be equal to one and one-quarter percent (11/4%) of the portion of his average final compensation not in excess of fifty-six hundred dollars ($5,600) plus one and one-half percent (11/2%) of the portion of such compensation in excess of fifty-six hundred dollars ($5,600), multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2a)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixtieth birthday but before his sixty-fifth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his service retirement allowance shall be computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his sixty-fifth birthday.

(2b)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixtieth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his service retirement allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years as computed in (2a) above.

(3)

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1965, and uniformed policemen or firemen not covered under the Social Security Act employed thereafter, shall receive not less than the benefits provided by G.S. 128-27(b).

(b5)

Service Retirement Allowances of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1976, but prior to July 1, 1978. —

Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1976, but prior to July 1, 1978, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

(1)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday, regardless of his years of creditable service, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, such allowance shall be equal to one and one-half percent (11/2%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2a)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixtieth birthday but before his sixty-fifth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of service, his service retirement allowance shall be computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his sixty-fifth birthday.

(2b)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixtieth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his service retirement allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years as computed in (2a) above.

(3)

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1965, and uniformed policemen or firemen not covered under the Social Security Act employed thereafter, shall receive not less than the benefits provided by G.S. 128-27(b).

(b6)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1978, but prior to July 1, 1983. —

Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1978, but prior to July 1, 1983, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

(1)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, such allowance shall be equal to one and fifty-five one-hundredths percent (1.55%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2a)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his sixtieth and before his sixty-fifth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall be computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his sixty-fifth birthday.

(2b)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixtieth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years as computed in (2a) above.

(3)

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1965, and uniformed policemen or firemen not covered under the Social Security Act employed thereafter, shall receive not less than the benefits provided by G.S. 128-27(b).

(b7)

Service Retirement Allowances of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1983, but prior to July 1, 1985. —

Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1983, but prior to July 1, 1985, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

(1)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his sixty-fifth birthday, regardless of his years of creditable service, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, such allowance shall be equal to one and fifty-seven one-hundredths percent (1.57%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2a)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his sixtieth and before his sixty-fifth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall be computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his sixty-fifth birthday.

(2b)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs before his sixtieth birthday and prior to his completion of 30 or more years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years as computed in (2a) above.

(3)

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1965, and uniformed policemen or firemen not covered under the Social Security Act employed thereafter, shall receive not less than the benefits provided by G.S. 128-27(b).

(b8)

Service Retirement Allowance of Law Enforcement Officers Retiring on or after January 1, 1986, but before July 1, 1988. —

Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after January 1, 1986, but before July 1, 1988, a member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and fifty-eight one hundredths percent (1.58%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his 50th and before his 55th birthday with 15 or more years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer and prior to his completion of 30 years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall be computed as in (1) above, but shall be reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his 55th birthday.

(b9)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1985, but before July 1, 1988. —

Upon retirement from service, in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1985, but before July 1, 1988, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday, regardless of his years of creditable service, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, such allowance shall be equal to one and fifty-eight one hundredths percent (1.58%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

(2)

Such allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 128-27(b7)(2a), (2b), and (3).

(b10)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1988, but before July 1, 1989. —

Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1988, but before July 1, 1989, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)

A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and sixty hundredths percent (1.60%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

Such allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 128-27(b8)(2).

(2)

A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of creditable service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, such allowance shall be equal to one and sixty-hundredths percent (1.60%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.

Such allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 128-27(b7)(2a), (2b) and (3).

(b11)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1989, but before July 1, 1990. —

Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1989, but before July 1, 1990, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)

A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and sixty-three hundredths percent (1.63%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.

This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 128-27(b8)(2).

(2)

A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of creditable service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and sixty-three hundredths percent (1.63%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

b.

This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 128-27(b7)(2a) and (3).

(b12)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1990, but before July 1, 1992. —

Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1990, but before July 1, 1992, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)

A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and sixty-four hundredths percent (1.64%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.

This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 128-27(b8)(2).

(2)

A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of creditable service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and sixty-four hundredths percent (1.64%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

b.

This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 128-27(b7)(2a) and (3).

(b13)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1992, but before July 1, 1994. —

Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) above, on or after July 1, 1992, but before July 1, 1994, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)

A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy hundredths percent (1.70%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.

This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 128-27(b8)(2).

(2)

A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of creditable service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy hundredths percent (1.70%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

b.

This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 128-27(b7)(2a), (2b), and (3).

(b14)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1994, but before July 1, 1995. —

Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) or (a1) above, on or after July 1, 1994, but before July 1, 1995, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)

A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy-one hundredths percent (1.71%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.

This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 128-27(b8)(2).

(2)

A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of creditable service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy-one hundredths percent (1.71%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

b.

This allowance shall also be governed by the provisions of G.S. 128-27(b7)(2a), (2b), and (3).

(b15)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or after July 1, 1995 but before July 1, 1997. —

Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) or (a1) above, on or after July 1, 1995, but before July 1, 1997, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)

A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy-two hundredths percent (1.72%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 50th birthday and before his 55th birthday with 15 or more years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer and prior to the completion of 30 years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of:

The service retirement allowance payable under G.S. 128-27(b15)(1)a. reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the member would have attained his 55th birthday; or

The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 128-27(b15)(1)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and his creditable service at retirement.

(2)

A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.

If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of creditable service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable service or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy-two hundredths percent (1.72%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

b.
